Hawaii statutes.
§269-93 Achieving portfolio standard. (a)
An electric utility company and its electric utility affiliates may aggregate
their renewable portfolios to achieve the renewable portfolio standard.

(b) If an electric utility company and its
electric utility affiliates aggregate their renewable portfolios to achieve the
renewable portfolio standard, the public utilities commission may distribute,
apportion, or allocate the costs and expenses of all or any portion of the
respective renewable portfolios among the electric utility company, its
electric utility affiliates, and their respective ratepayers, as is reasonable
under the circumstances.

(c) An electric utility company may recover,
through an automatic rate adjustment clause, the electric utility company's
revenue requirement resulting from the distribution, apportionment, or
allocation of the costs and expenses of the renewable portfolios of the
electric utility company and its electric utility affiliates.

(d) To provide for timely recovery of the revenue
requirement under subsection (c), the commission may establish a separate
automatic rate adjustment clause, or approve the use of a previously approved
automatic rate adjustment clause, without a rate case filing. The use of the
automatic rate adjustment clause to recover the revenue requirement shall be
allowed to continue until the revenue requirement is incorporated in rates in
the respective electric utility company's rate case. [L 2001, c 272, §4; am L
2011, c 69, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next